Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 1071.
Duties of the Director.

The Director shall:

provide general information to applicants for licensure as property inspectors;

receive applications for licensure and issue licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter;

administer fees as established by law;

refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer;

renew, revoke, and reinstate licenses as ordered by an administrative law officer; and

explain appeal procedures to licensed property inspectors and to applicants, and complaint procedures to the public.

The Director may adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this section and may adopt rules establishing standards of practice for the profession.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1072.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint two property inspectors for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to property inspection. One of the initial appointments may be for less than a five-year term.

An appointee shall have not less than five years’ experience as a property inspector immediately preceding appointment, shall be licensed as a property inspector in Vermont, and shall be actively engaged in the practice of property inspecting in this State during incumbency.

The Director shall seek the advice of the property inspector advisors in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.